District of Columbia statutes.
1-610.74

Leave accrual for lateral law enforcement officers.

For the purposes of § 1-612.03, years of law enforcement experience, as determined by the Mayor or his or her designee, shall constitute years of District government service for any employee hired as a lateral law enforcement officer pursuant to § 1-610.72.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1074
as added Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-160, § 102(b), 47 DCR 4619

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-610.73.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-611.74.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 2(b) of the Lateral Appointment of Law Enforcement Officers Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-305, April 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2701).